work/esperanto.aff
flag *G:	# IG-verboj
    A >	-A,IGI
    A >	-A,IGAS
    A >	-A,IGIS
    A >	-A,IGOS
    A >	-A,IGUS
    A >	-A,IGU
    A	>	-A,IGINTA
    A	>	-A,IGINTAJ
    A	>	-A,IGINTAJN
    A	>	-A,IGINTAN
    A	>	-A,IGINTE
    A	>	-A,IGINT^'
    A	>	-A,IGINTO
    A	>	-A,IGINTOJ
    A	>	-A,IGINTOJN
    A	>	-A,IGINTON
    A	>	-A,IGANTA
    A	>	-A,IGANTAJ
    A	>	-A,IGANTAJN
    A	>	-A,IGANTAN
    A	>	-A,IGANTE
    A	>	-A,IGANT^'
    A	>	-A,IGANTO
    A	>	-A,IGANTOJ
    A	>	-A,IGANTOJN
    A	>	-A,IGANTON
    A	>	-A,IGONTA
    A	>	-A,IGONTAJ
    A	>	-A,IGONTAJN
    A	>	-A,IGONTAN
    A	>	-A,IGONTE
    A	>	-A,IGONT^'
    A	>	-A,IGONTO
    A	>	-A,IGONTOJ
    A	>	-A,IGONTOJN
    A	>	-A,IGONTON
   A	>	-A,IGINTINA
    A	>	-A,IGINTINAJ
    A	>	-A,IGINTINAJN
    A	>	-A,IGINTINAN
    A	>	-A,IGINTIN^'
    A	>	-A,IGINTINO
    A	>	-A,IGINTINOJ
    A	>	-A,IGINTINOJN
    A	>	-A,IGINTINON
    A	>	-A,IGANTINA
    A	>	-A,IGANTINAJ
    A	>	-A,IGANTINAJN
    A	>	-A,IGANTINAN
    A	>	-A,IGANTIN^'
    A	>	-A,IGANTINO
    A	>	-A,IGANTINOJ
    A	>	-A,IGANTINOJN
    A	>	-A,IGANTINON
    A	>	-A,IGONTINA
    A	>	-A,IGONTINAJ
    A	>	-A,IGONTINAJN
    A	>	-A,IGONTINAN
    A	>	-A,IGONTIN^'
    A	>	-A,IGONTINO
    A	>	-A,IGONTINOJ
    A	>	-A,IGONTINOJN
    A	>	-A,IGONTINON
    A	>	-A,IGA
    A	>	-A,IGAJ
    A	>	-A,IGAJN
    A	>	-A,IGAN
    A	>	-A,IGE
    A	>	-A,IG^'
    A	>	-A,IGO
    A	>	-A,IGOJ
    A	>	-A,IGOJN
    A	>	-A,IGON

    A	>	-A,IGITA
    A	>	-A,IGITAJ
    A	>	-A,IGITAJN
    A	>	-A,IGITAN
    A	>	-A,IGITE
    A	>	-A,IGIT^'
    A	>	-A,IGITO
    A	>	-A,IGITOJ
    A	>	-A,IGITOJN
    A	>	-A,IGITON
    A	>	-A,IGATA
    A	>	-A,IGATAJ
    A	>	-A,IGATAJN
    A	>	-A,IGATAN
    A	>	-A,IGATE
    A	>	-A,IGAT^'
    A	>	-A,IGATO
    A	>	-A,IGATOJ
    A	>	-A,IGATOJN
    A	>	-A,IGATON
    A	>	-A,IGOTA
    A	>	-A,IGOTAJ
    A	>	-A,IGOTAJN
    A	>	-A,IGOTAN
    A	>	-A,IGOTE
    A	>	-A,IGOT^'
    A	>	-A,IGOTO
    A	>	-A,IGOTOJ
    A	>	-A,IGOTOJN
    A	>	-A,IGOTON
    A >	-A,IGEBLAS
    A >	-A,IGEBLIS
    A >	-A,IGEBLOS
    A >	-A,IGEBLUS
    A	>	-A,IGEBLA
    A	>	-A,IGEBLAJ
    A	>	-A,IGEBLAJN
    A	>	-A,IGEBLAN
    A	>	-A,IGEBLE
    A	>	-A,IGEBL^'
    A	>	-A,IGEBLO
    A	>	-A,IGEBLOJ
    A	>	-A,IGEBLOJN
    A	>	-A,IGEBLON

    A	>	-A,IGEBLEC^'
    A	>	-A,IGEBLECO
    A	>	-A,IGEBLECOJ
    A	>	-A,IGEBLECOJN
    A	>	-A,IGEBLECON
    A >	-A,IGENDAS
    A >	-A,IGENDIS
    A >	-A,IGENDOS
    A >	-A,IGENDUS
    A	>	-A,IGENDA
    A	>	-A,IGENDAJ
    A	>	-A,IGENDAJN
    A	>	-A,IGENDAN
    A	>	-A,IGENDE
    A	>	-A,IGEND^'
    A	>	-A,IGENDO
    A	>	-A,IGENDOJ
    A	>	-A,IGENDOJN
    A	>	-A,IGENDON	# pas. part.

    A >	-A,IGADI
    A >	-A,IGADAS
    A >	-A,IGADIS
    A >	-A,IGADOS
    A >	-A,IGADUS
    A >	-A,IGADU
    A	>	-A,IGADA
    A	>	-A,IGADAJ
    A	>	-A,IGADAJN
    A	>	-A,IGADAN
    A	>	-A,IGADE
    A	>	-A,IGAD^'
    A	>	-A,IGADO
    A	>	-A,IGADOJ
    A	>	-A,IGADOJN
    A	>	-A,IGADON

    I	>	GADA
    I	>	GADAJ
    I	>	GADAJN
    I	>	GADAN
    I	>	GADE
    I	>	GAD^'
    I	>	GADO
    I	>	GADOJ
    I	>	GADOJN
    I	>	GADON
    I >	GADI
    I >	GADAS
    I >	GADIS
    I >	GADOS
    I >	GADUS
    I >	GADU
    I >	GI
    I >	GAS
    I >	GIS
    I >	GOS
    I >	GUS
    I >	GU
    I	>	GINTA
    I	>	GINTAJ
    I	>	GINTAJN
    I	>	GINTAN
    I	>	GINTE
    I	>	GINT^'
    I	>	GINTO
    I	>	GINTOJ
    I	>	GINTOJN
    I	>	GINTON
    I	>	GANTA
    I	>	GANTAJ
    I	>	GANTAJN
    I	>	GANTAN
    I	>	GANTE
    I	>	GANT^'
    I	>	GANTO
    I	>	GANTOJ
    I	>	GANTOJN
    I	>	GANTON
    I	>	GONTA
    I	>	GONTAJ
    I	>	GONTAJN
    I	>	GONTAN
    I	>	GONTE
    I	>	GONT^'
    I	>	GONTO
    I	>	GONTOJ
    I	>	GONTOJN
    I	>	GONTON
   I	>	GINTINA
    I	>	GINTINAJ
    I	>	GINTINAJN
    I	>	GINTINAN
    I	>	GINTIN^'
    I	>	GINTINO
    I	>	GINTINOJ
    I	>	GINTINOJN
    I	>	GINTINON
    I	>	GANTINA
    I	>	GANTINAJ
    I	>	GANTINAJN
    I	>	GANTINAN
    I	>	GANTIN^'
    I	>	GANTINO
    I	>	GANTINOJ
    I	>	GANTINOJN
    I	>	GANTINON
    I	>	GONTINA
    I	>	GONTINAJ
    I	>	GONTINAJN
    I	>	GONTINAN
    I	>	GONTIN^'
    I	>	GONTINO
    I	>	GONTINOJ
    I	>	GONTINOJN
    I	>	GONTINON
    I	>	GA
    I	>	GAJ
    I	>	GAJN
    I	>	GAN
    I	>	GE
    I	>	G^'
    I	>	GO
    I	>	GOJ
    I	>	GOJN
    I	>	GON
    I	>	GITA
    I	>	GITAJ
    I	>	GITAJN
    I	>	GITAN
    I	>	GITE
    I	>	GIT^'
    I	>	GITO
    I	>	GITOJ
    I	>	GITOJN
    I	>	GITON
    I	>	GATA
    I	>	GATAJ
    I	>	GATAJN
    I	>	GATAN
    I	>	GATE
    I	>	GAT^'
    I	>	GATO
    I	>	GATOJ
    I	>	GATOJN
    I	>	GATON
    I	>	GOTA
    I	>	GOTAJ
    I	>	GOTAJN
    I	>	GOTAN
    I	>	GOTE
    I	>	GOT^'
    I	>	GOTO
    I	>	GOTOJ
    I	>	GOTOJN
    I	>	GOTON
    I >	GEBLAS
    I >	GEBLIS
    I >	GEBLOS
    I >	GEBLUS
    I	>	GEBLA
    I	>	GEBLAJ
    I	>	GEBLAJN
    I	>	GEBLAN
    I	>	GEBLE
    I	>	GEBL^'
    I	>	GEBLO
    I	>	GEBLOJ
    I	>	GEBLOJN
    I	>	GEBLON

    I	>	GEBLEC^'
    I	>	GEBLECO
    I	>	GEBLECOJ
    I	>	GEBLECOJN
    I	>	GEBLECON
    I >	GENDAS
    I >	GENDIS
    I >	GENDOS
    I >	GENDUS
    I	>	GENDA
    I	>	GENDAJ
    I	>	GENDAJN
    I	>	GENDAN
    I	>	GENDE
    I	>	GEND^'
    I	>	GENDO
    I	>	GENDOJ
    I	>	GENDOJN
    I	>	GENDON
    U	>	-U,IGADA
    U	>	-U,IGADAJ
    U	>	-U,IGADAJN
    U	>	-U,IGADAN
    U	>	-U,IGADE
    U	>	-U,IGAD^'
    U	>	-U,IGADO
    U	>	-U,IGADOJ
    U	>	-U,IGADOJN
    U	>	-U,IGADON
    U >	-U,IGADI
    U >	-U,IGADAS
    U >	-U,IGADIS
    U >	-U,IGADOS
    U >	-U,IGADUS
    U >	-U,IGADU
    U >	-U,IGI
    U >	-U,IGAS
    U >	-U,IGIS
    U >	-U,IGOS
    U >	-U,IGUS
    U >	-U,IGU
    U	>	-U,IGINTA
    U	>	-U,IGINTAJ
    U	>	-U,IGINTAJN
    U	>	-U,IGINTAN
    U	>	-U,IGINTE
    U	>	-U,IGINT^'
    U	>	-U,IGINTO
    U	>	-U,IGINTOJ
    U	>	-U,IGINTOJN
    U	>	-U,IGINTON
    U	>	-U,IGANTA
    U	>	-U,IGANTAJ
    U	>	-U,IGANTAJN
    U	>	-U,IGANTAN
    U	>	-U,IGANTE
    U	>	-U,IGANT^'
    U	>	-U,IGANTO
    U	>	-U,IGANTOJ
    U	>	-U,IGANTOJN
    U	>	-U,IGANTON
    U	>	-U,IGONTA
    U	>	-U,IGONTAJ
    U	>	-U,IGONTAJN
    U	>	-U,IGONTAN
    U	>	-U,IGONTE
    U	>	-U,IGONT^'
    U	>	-U,IGONTO
    U	>	-U,IGONTOJ
    U	>	-U,IGONTOJN
    U	>	-U,IGONTON
   U	>	-U,IGINTINA
    U	>	-U,IGINTINAJ
    U	>	-U,IGINTINAJN
    U	>	-U,IGINTINAN
    U	>	-U,IGINTIN^'
    U	>	-U,IGINTINO
    U	>	-U,IGINTINOJ
    U	>	-U,IGINTINOJN
    U	>	-U,IGINTINON
    U	>	-U,IGANTINA
    U	>	-U,IGANTINAJ
    U	>	-U,IGANTINAJN
    U	>	-U,IGANTINAN
    U	>	-U,IGANTIN^'
    U	>	-U,IGANTINO
    U	>	-U,IGANTINOJ
    U	>	-U,IGANTINOJN
    U	>	-U,IGANTINON
    U	>	-U,IGONTINA
    U	>	-U,IGONTINAJ
    U	>	-U,IGONTINAJN
    U	>	-U,IGONTINAN
    U	>	-U,IGONTIN^'
    U	>	-U,IGONTINO
    U	>	-U,IGONTINOJ
    U	>	-U,IGONTINOJN
    U	>	-U,IGONTINON
    U	>	-U,IGA
    U	>	-U,IGAJ
    U	>	-U,IGAJN
    U	>	-U,IGAN
    U	>	-U,IGE
    U	>	-U,IG^'
    U	>	-U,IGO
    U	>	-U,IGOJ
    U	>	-U,IGOJN
    U	>	-U,IGON
    U	>	-U,IGITA
    U	>	-U,IGITAJ
    U	>	-U,IGITAJN
    U	>	-U,IGITAN
    U	>	-U,IGITE
    U	>	-U,IGIT^'
    U	>	-U,IGITO
    U	>	-U,IGITOJ
    U	>	-U,IGITOJN
    U	>	-U,IGITON
    U	>	-U,IGATA
    U	>	-U,IGATAJ
    U	>	-U,IGATAJN
    U	>	-U,IGATAN
    U	>	-U,IGATE
    U	>	-U,IGAT^'
    U	>	-U,IGATO
    U	>	-U,IGATOJ
    U	>	-U,IGATOJN
    U	>	-U,IGATON
    U	>	-U,IGOTA
    U	>	-U,IGOTAJ
    U	>	-U,IGOTAJN
    U	>	-U,IGOTAN
    U	>	-U,IGOTE
    U	>	-U,IGOT^'
    U	>	-U,IGOTO
    U	>	-U,IGOTOJ
    U	>	-U,IGOTOJN
    U	>	-U,IGOTON
    U >	-U,IGEBLAS
    U >	-U,IGEBLIS
    U >	-U,IGEBLOS
    U >	-U,IGEBLUS
    U	>	-U,IGEBLA
    U	>	-U,IGEBLAJ
    U	>	-U,IGEBLAJN
    U	>	-U,IGEBLAN
    U	>	-U,IGEBLE
    U	>	-U,IGEBL^'
    U	>	-U,IGEBLO
    U	>	-U,IGEBLOJ
    U	>	-U,IGEBLOJN
    U	>	-U,IGEBLON

    U	>	-U,IGEBLEC^'
    U	>	-U,IGEBLECO
    U	>	-U,IGEBLECOJ
    U	>	-U,IGEBLECOJN
    U	>	-U,IGEBLECON
    U >	-U,IGENDAS
    U >	-U,IGENDIS
    U >	-U,IGENDOS
    U >	-U,IGENDUS
    U	>	-U,IGENDA
    U	>	-U,IGENDAJ
    U	>	-U,IGENDAJN
    U	>	-U,IGENDAN
    U	>	-U,IGENDE
    U	>	-U,IGEND^'
    U	>	-U,IGENDO
    U	>	-U,IGENDOJ
    U	>	-U,IGENDOJN
    U	>	-U,IGENDON

    O >	-O,IGI
    O >	-O,IGAS
    O >	-O,IGIS
    O >	-O,IGOS
    O >	-O,IGUS
    O >	-O,IGU
    O	>	-O,IGINTA
    O	>	-O,IGINTAJ
    O	>	-O,IGINTAJN
    O	>	-O,IGINTAN
    O	>	-O,IGINTE
    O	>	-O,IGINT^'
    O	>	-O,IGINTO
    O	>	-O,IGINTOJ
    O	>	-O,IGINTOJN
    O	>	-O,IGINTON
    O	>	-O,IGANTA
    O	>	-O,IGANTAJ
    O	>	-O,IGANTAJN
    O	>	-O,IGANTAN
    O	>	-O,IGANTE
    O	>	-O,IGANT^'
    O	>	-O,IGANTO
    O	>	-O,IGANTOJ
    O	>	-O,IGANTOJN
    O	>	-O,IGANTON
    O	>	-O,IGONTA
    O	>	-O,IGONTAJ
    O	>	-O,IGONTAJN
    O	>	-O,IGONTAN
    O	>	-O,IGONTE
    O	>	-O,IGONT^'
    O	>	-O,IGONTO
    O	>	-O,IGONTOJ
    O	>	-O,IGONTOJN
    O	>	-O,IGONTON
   O	>	-O,IGINTINA
    O	>	-O,IGINTINAJ
    O	>	-O,IGINTINAJN
    O	>	-O,IGINTINAN
    O	>	-O,IGINTIN^'
    O	>	-O,IGINTINO
    O	>	-O,IGINTINOJ
    O	>	-O,IGINTINOJN
    O	>	-O,IGINTINON
    O	>	-O,IGANTINA
    O	>	-O,IGANTINAJ
    O	>	-O,IGANTINAJN
    O	>	-O,IGANTINAN
    O	>	-O,IGANTIN^'
    O	>	-O,IGANTINO
    O	>	-O,IGANTINOJ
    O	>	-O,IGANTINOJN
    O	>	-O,IGANTINON
    O	>	-O,IGONTINA
    O	>	-O,IGONTINAJ
    O	>	-O,IGONTINAJN
    O	>	-O,IGONTINAN
    O	>	-O,IGONTIN^'
    O	>	-O,IGONTINO
    O	>	-O,IGONTINOJ
    O	>	-O,IGONTINOJN
    O	>	-O,IGONTINON
    O	>	-O,IGA
    O	>	-O,IGAJ
    O	>	-O,IGAJN
    O	>	-O,IGAN
    O	>	-O,IGE
    O	>	-O,IG^'
    O	>	-O,IGO
    O	>	-O,IGOJ
    O	>	-O,IGOJN
    O	>	-O,IGON
    O	>	-O,IGITA
    O	>	-O,IGITAJ
    O	>	-O,IGITAJN
    O	>	-O,IGITAN
    O	>	-O,IGITE
    O	>	-O,IGIT^'
    O	>	-O,IGITO
    O	>	-O,IGITOJ
    O	>	-O,IGITOJN
    O	>	-O,IGITON
    O	>	-O,IGATA
    O	>	-O,IGATAJ
    O	>	-O,IGATAJN
    O	>	-O,IGATAN
    O	>	-O,IGATE
    O	>	-O,IGAT^'
    O	>	-O,IGATO
    O	>	-O,IGATOJ
    O	>	-O,IGATOJN
    O	>	-O,IGATON
    O	>	-O,IGOTA
    O	>	-O,IGOTAJ
    O	>	-O,IGOTAJN
    O	>	-O,IGOTAN
    O	>	-O,IGOTE
    O	>	-O,IGOT^'
    O	>	-O,IGOTO
    O	>	-O,IGOTOJ
    O	>	-O,IGOTOJN
    O	>	-O,IGOTON
    O >	-O,IGEBLAS
    O >	-O,IGEBLIS
    O >	-O,IGEBLOS
    O >	-O,IGEBLUS
    O	>	-O,IGEBLA
    O	>	-O,IGEBLAJ
    O	>	-O,IGEBLAJN
    O	>	-O,IGEBLAN
    O	>	-O,IGEBLE
    O	>	-O,IGEBL^'
    O	>	-O,IGEBLO
    O	>	-O,IGEBLOJ
    O	>	-O,IGEBLOJN
    O	>	-O,IGEBLON

    O	>	-O,IGEBLEC^'
    O	>	-O,IGEBLECO
    O	>	-O,IGEBLECOJ
    O	>	-O,IGEBLECOJN
    O	>	-O,IGEBLECON
    O >	-O,IGENDAS
    O >	-O,IGENDIS
    O >	-O,IGENDOS
    O >	-O,IGENDUS
    O	>	-O,IGENDA
    O	>	-O,IGENDAJ
    O	>	-O,IGENDAJN
    O	>	-O,IGENDAN
    O	>	-O,IGENDE
    O	>	-O,IGEND^'
    O	>	-O,IGENDO
    O	>	-O,IGENDOJ
    O	>	-O,IGENDOJN
    O	>	-O,IGENDON
    O >	-O,IGADI
    O >	-O,IGADAS
    O >	-O,IGADIS
    O >	-O,IGADOS
    O >	-O,IGADUS
    O >	-O,IGADU
    O	>	-O,IGADA
    O	>	-O,IGADAJ
    O	>	-O,IGADAJN
    O	>	-O,IGADAN
    O	>	-O,IGADE
    O	>	-O,IGAD^'
    O	>	-O,IGADO
    O	>	-O,IGADOJ
    O	>	-O,IGADOJN
    O	>	-O,IGADON

flag H:

    A	>	-A,UJA
    A	>	-A,UJAJ
    A	>	-A,UJAJN
    A	>	-A,UJAN
    A	>	-A,UJE
    A	>	-A,UJ^'
    A	>	-A,UJO
    A	>	-A,UJOJ
    A	>	-A,UJOJN
    A	>	-A,UJON
    I	>	-I,UJA
    I	>	-I,UJAJ
    I	>	-I,UJAJN
    I	>	-I,UJAN
    I	>	-I,UJE
    I	>	-I,UJ^'
    I	>	-I,UJO
    I	>	-I,UJOJ
    I	>	-I,UJOJN
    I	>	-I,UJON
    O	>	-O,UJA
    O	>	-O,UJAJ
    O	>	-O,UJAJN
    O	>	-O,UJAN
    O	>	-O,UJE
    O	>	-O,UJ^'
    O	>	-O,UJO
    O	>	-O,UJOJ
    O	>	-O,UJOJN
    O	>	-O,UJON
